Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,140
Registration fees; to whom payable.

All fees for the registration of motor vehicles or trailers, unless
otherwise expressly provided, shall be paid to the county treasurer of
the county in which the motor vehicle or trailer has situs. If registered
pursuant to section 60-3,198, all fees shall be paid to the department.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 140;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 77.